Hawaii statutes.
§651-20 Judgment satisfied out of attached
property. If judgment is recovered by the plaintiff, the levying officer
shall satisfy the same out of the property attached by the levying officer
which has not been delivered to the defendant or claimant, as in this chapter
provided, or subjected to execution on another judgment recovered before the
issuing of the attachment, if it is sufficient for that purpose:

(1) By applying on the execution issued on the
judgment the proceeds of all sales of perishable or other property sold by the
levying officer, or so much as shall be necessary to satisfy the judgment; and

(2) If any balance remains due, the levying officer
shall sell under the execution so much of the property, real or personal, as
may be necessary to satisfy the balance, if enough for that purpose remains in
the levying officer's hands. Notice of the sale shall be given and the sale
conducted as in other cases of sales on execution. In all cases the personal
property shall first be sold. [L 1905, c 84, §20; RL 1925, §2824; RL 1935,
§4209; RL 1945, §10160; RL 1955, §233-20; HRS §651-20; gen ch 1985]

Revision Note

In paragraph (1), "and" added after ending
punctuation pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next